Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5059HV (3) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2247 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13H Extracurricular 1 interscholastic athletic contests or competitions ââ acceptance 2 of legal tender required. 3 1. For purposes of this section, âorganizationâ means the 4 same as defined in section 280.13. 5 2. A public school shall accept legal tender as a form of 6 payment for entry into any extracurricular interscholastic 7 athletic contest or competition sponsored by an organization. 8 As a condition of registration with the department of education 9 under section 280.13 , an organization shall accept legal 10 tender as a form of payment for entry into any extracurricular 11 interscholastic athletic contest or competition sponsored by 12 the organization. 13 3. This section shall not apply to extracurricular 14 interscholastic athletic contests or competitions that take 15 place at schools that are not members of an organization. 16